Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201585-502.01
Public college or university; veteran; spouse or dependent of veteran; eligible recipient under federal law; resident student; requirements.

(1) A person who enrolls in a public college or university in this state and who is a veteran as defined in Title 38 of the United States Code and was discharged or released from a period of not fewer than ninety days of service in the active military, naval, or air service less than three years before the date of initial enrollment, a spouse or dependent of such a veteran, or an eligible recipient entitled to educational assistance of such a veteran as provided in 38 U.S.C. 3311(b)(9) or 38 U.S.C. 3319, as such sections existed on January 1, 2015, shall be considered a resident student notwithstanding the provisions of section 85-502 if the person is (a) registered to vote in Nebraska and (b) demonstrates objective evidence of intent to be a resident of Nebraska.

(2) A person who is an eligible individual under 38 U.S.C. 3679(c)(2), as such section existed on January 1, 2015, or who is a spouse or dependent of such a veteran under eighteen years of age is not required to comply with subdivision (1)(a) of this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, objective evidence of intent to be a resident of Nebraska includes either a Nebraska driver's license or state identification card or a Nebraska motor vehicle registration.

Laws 2014, LB740, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB109, § 1.
February 27, 2015